src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Morphology
INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF ERZYA.

Analysis symbols

The morphological analyses of wordforms of ERZYA are presented
in this system in terms of following symbols.
(It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).
* +TYÄ WORK HAS TO BE DONE

*  %    

## The parts-of-speech are:

* +A adjective
* +Adp adposition
* +Adv adverb
* +CS subordinating conjunction
* +CC coordinating conjunction
* +Det determiner
* +Descr descriptive
* +Interj interjection
* +N noun
* +Num numerals
* +Pcle particle
* +Po postposition
* +Pr preposition (in Russian loans)
* +Pron pronoun
* +Qnt quantifier
* +V verb

## Parts of speech are further split up into:
Adjectives
* +Adn Adnominal (modifier) !! This is not an NP head like +Pron
* +Bahuvrihi This is a nominative-case NP used as an adjective
* +bahuvrihi get rid of these for upper-case

Adverbs
* +Ideoph These are ideophonic descriptors used to modify the verb
вырк ливтясь "**flit** and it flew off"
"Ideophone: A vivid representation of an idea in sound. A word, often
onomatopoeic, which describes a predicate, qualificative or adverb in 
respect to manner, colour, sound, smell, action, state or intensity."
(Doke 1935:118)
* +Manner with reference to type of adverb
* +Parenthetic parenthetic
* +Spat spatial
* +Iter Iterative  form expressing number of times; myv: `кавксть`, kpv: `кыкысь`
* +Mult Multiplicative, two-ply; myv: `кавонькирда`
* +Deg Ad-adjective This is degree, depricate + AdA
* +Epist epistemic modality marker speaker's evaluation/judgment of, degree of confidence in
* +EvidNfh not first-hand келя
* +EvidFh first-hand
* +PerifMod periferal modifier ськамонзо

Interjections
* +Formulaic 

Nouns
* +Prop proper

Particles

Postpositions
**+ Spat**, **+ Temp**

## Pronouns
* +Dem demonstrative
* +Indef indefinite
* +Dep dependent word requiring the presence of another, e.g. **мень**
* **+Exclusive**:  ськамонза
* **+Intensive**:  intensive pronoun
* +Interr interrogative
* **+PerifMod**:  periferal modifier ськамонза, кавонест
* +Pers personal
* +Recipr reciprocal
* +Refl reflexive
* +Rel relative
* +Relat relator noun
* +Sel selective, when selecting from a set of definites
* +Short тень, теть; эстень
* +Long монень, тонеть; монстень

* +Sg1 first person singular
* +Sg2 second person singular
* +Sg3 third person singular
* +Pl1 first person plural
* +Pl2 second person plural
* +Pl3 third person plural

## Quantifiers (numerals)
Quantifiers and Numerals are classified under:
* +Appr Approximative numeral кавто-колмо, колмошка *two or three*
NB! do not confuse with Komi case +Apr
* +AssocColl -ne- ; avide-
* +Assoc +мезть
* +Card cardinal + NCard
* +Coll collective
* +Distr Distributive
* +Ord ordinal + NOrd
* **+Exclusive**:  ськамонзо

## Nominals are inflected for Number and Case
## Number
* +Sg singular
* +Pl plural
* +SP ambiguous for number, general number

## Case
* +Abe abessive
* +Abl ablative case
* +Com Comitative "-нек/-нэк"
* +Cmpr Comparative case form -шка
* +Dat dative
* +Ela elative case
* +Gen genitive case
* +Ill illative
* +Ine inessive
* +Lat lative
* +Loc Locative "вить ён : вить ёно"
* +Nom nominative case
* +Prl prolative "га/ка/ва"
* +Tra translative: used in similative and depictive constructions
to mark what would be a secondary subject: 
--вармакс оргодсь тосто--
* +Temp Temporalis case form "-не/-нэ" previously TempCx
* +Voc Vocative

## Possession and other declension types are marked with:
* +PxSg1 first person singular
* +PxSg2 second person singular
* +PxSg3 third person singular
* +PxSP3 third person singular or plural with dative only
* +PxPl1 first person plural
* +PxPl2 second person plural
* +PxPl3 third person plural
* +Def Definite

## The comparative forms are:
* +Comp comparative as opposed to superlative
* +Superl superlative
* +Attr Attribute

## Verb moods are:
* +Cond conditional Ындеря- (Derivational)
* +Conj conjunctional "вОль"
* +Des desiderative Ыксэль "was about to; wanted to"
* +Ind indicative
* +Imprt imperative
* +Opt optative
* +Prec precative
* +Proh prohibitive is distinct from the negation of imperative
Иля аварде! `Don't cry' (Proh);
Аволь мелявтт, кецяк! `Don't worry, be happy!' (Neg + Imprt)

### Infinitive moods
* +Oblig modality: deontic/directive/obligative
андомс: андома , якамс: якама
* +Delib **+Sugg modality**: deontic/directive/deliberative
I still need the right word for this андомс: андомсат

## Tenses in the indicative and infrequently in the conditional
* +Prs In Erzya There is no morphological distinction
between present and future
* +Prt1 Preterite 1
* +Prt2 Preterite 2 (This is also used in predicate forms not involving a finite verb.)

## Verb personal forms are:
* +ScSg1 * subject conjugation first person singular
* +ScSg2 * subject conjugation second person singular
* +ScSg3 * subject conjugation third person singular
* +ScPl1 * subject conjugation first person plural
* +ScPl2 * subject conjugation second person plural
* +ScPl3 * subject conjugation third person plural
## Object conjugation
* +OcSg1 * object conjugation first person singular
* +OcSg2 * object conjugation second person singular
* +OcSg3 * object conjugation third person singular
* +OcPl1 * object conjugation first person plural
* +OcPl2 * object conjugation second person plural
* +OcPl3 * object conjugation third person plural

Other verb forms are
* +Act * active voice (exo-tradition)
* +PrsPrc * present participle (only non-contrastive usage)
* +DemPrc * present participle (both contrastive and non-contrastive)
* +ActPrcLong  %{иы%}й (This is dealt with elsewhere as an active present participle)
* +ActPrcShort  %{иы%}  (This is dealt with elsewhere as an active present participle)
* +ActDemPrc  %{иы%}ця  (This is dealt with elsewhere as an active present participle)
* +ConNeg * connegative, main verb complement to Neg, vow-stem
* +ConNegII * connegative, main verb complement to Neg, cons-stem
* +Ger * gerund This is used with Der/Ozj and VAbl
* +Inf * infinitive
* +Neg * verb of negation эзь, аволь, иля, апак
* +ConvPrc * converb OR participle апак
* +Prc * participle
* +VGen * Verb Genitive, genitive form participle
* +VAbl * Verb Ablative "озадо"
* +Prc/Telic * Telic participle  "саевть"
* +Der/Abe * ВтОмО
* +Der/Cmpr * шка
* +Der/A * adjective derived from N or V
* +Der/N2A * adjective derived from N
* +Der/V2A * adjective derived from V
* +Subst * deverbal nouns retaining verb arguments/gov

* +PrfPrc 

## The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
* +Err/Orth * Substandard
* +Err/Sub * Substandard
* +Err/Orth-no-hyphen * тетятават should be тетят-ават
* +Err/Orth-back-should-be-hard-front * back should be hard front
* +Err/Orth-cons-stem * пачт|емс 2012 пачтямс
* +Err/Orth-freq-le * пачтнемс:пачле
* +Err/Orth-cons-stem * эзь эряв
* +Err/Orth-front-linking-vowel * linking vowel is front уряжень
* +Err/Orth-high-linking-vowel * linking vowel is high
* +Err/Orth-mid-linking-vowel-should-be-high * linking vowel is mid вечкелизь should be вечкилизь
* +Err/Orth-mid-onset-default-missing * should be скаломок, but this is скалмок, мелезэнек: мельзэнек
* +Err/Orth-no-linking-vowel * linking vowel is missing
* +Err/Orth-shib-hard * Иважнэнь
* +Err/Orth-stem-a-should-be-o0 * чачтомс+V:чачта
* +Err/Orth-stem-hard-e-should-be-je * Nekshnems
* +Err/Orth-stem-ja-should-be-je0 * лемдемс+V:лемдя
* +Err/Orth-stem-je-should-be-ja * мелямс:меле
* +Err/Orth-stem-je-should-be-je0 * чудемс+V:чуде чуд|емс (->)чуде|мс
* +Err/Orth-je-for-jo * should be ё
* +Err/Orth-vowel-stem-je * пачтякшномс:пачтекшне
* +Err/Orth-stem-soft-should-be-0 * кирпець:кирпецьтне
* +Err/Orth-stem-nodent-hard-should-be-tnje * потоктнэсэ
* +Err/Orth-missing-soft-in-stem * видме
* +Err/Orth-missing-t-in-def-pl * область: областне
* +Err/Orth-s-to-j * кайсь Modern: кассь
* +Err/Orth-z-to-j * кардайсэ Modern: кардазсо
* +Err/Orth-v-loss-before-lab * ольной
* +Err/Orth-split-tween * гемень, кавтово
* +Err/Orth-0-not-pal * no soft sign but should take soft sign
* +Err/Orth-f * not v but instead f
* +Err/Orth-s * not v but instead s
* +Err/Orth-d * not t but instead d
* +Err/Orth-colloq * colloquial, e.g. Минорыч
* +Err/Orth-old1 * old1 like озимь, морковь
* +Err/Orth-pre1880 * orthography preceding 1880
* +Err/Orth-pre1978 * orthography preceding 1978
* +Err/Orth-pre2012 * previous orthography
* +Use/Marg * Marginal
* +Use/-Spell * Exclude from speller
* +Use/SpellNoSugg * recognized but not suggested in speller
* +Use/Circ * Circular path
* +Use/CircN * Circular number path
* +Use/-Ped * Remove from pedagogical speller
* +Use/NG * Do not generate, for isme-ped.fst and apertium
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

* +Err/Lex * The lemma is not an Erzya word (Depricating --+Src/F--)

* +URL * For tagging URLs

# Dialect tags
* +Dial/SH * Short forms
* +Dial/L * Long forms
* +Dial * No specification
Specific to some dialects
Rueter 2010: 8
* +Dial/-C * Not central standard
* +Dial/C * 1 Central or Kozlovka-Mokshlei
* +Dial/W * 2 Western or Insar
* +Dial/W-NW * 2 Western or Insar, subgroup NW
* +Dial/W-SW * 2 Western or Insar, subgrou0 SW
* +Dial/NW * 3 North-Western or Alatyr
* +Dial/SE * 4 South-Eastern or Sura
* +Dial/M * 5 Mixed or Drakino-Shoksha

# Orthography tags
* +Orth/PhonDeriv * Derivation is phonetic but declension and conjugation morphologic
* +Orth/PhonInfl * Entire inflection is phonetic 1821, 1920-30
* +Orth/standard * described in 2008, dictionary 2012
* +Orth/thirties * 1939–1955 phonetic, morphological
* +Orth/fifties * 1955–1978 phonetic, morphological
* +Orth/seventies * 1978–1993 phonetic, morphological
* +Orth/nineties * 1993-2008 morphological, but phonetic compounding
* +Orth/wiki * Regular-semantic deriving from 1993 and 2008
* +Orth/-wiki * e.g. compound words written with white space
* +Orth/standard_wiki * e.g. вайгельпе
* +Orth/-thirties * e.g. таргсемс, студенттнэ
* +Orth/Colloq Colloquial speech reflected in spelling

# Abbreviated words are classified with:
* +ABBR * Abbreviation
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* +ACR * Acronym

## Special symbols 

Delimiter marks are classified with:
* +CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT +MIDDLE * 
* %^excl * 

The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:

* +TV * transitive verb
* +IV * intransitive verb
* +NomAg Actor Noun From Verb - Nomen Agentis (ready)
* +NomAct Action Noun From Verb - Nomen Actio (ready)
* +Dimin Diminutive 

Auxiliary verbs
* +Aux * 

Special multiword units are analysed with:
*  +Multi 

Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:
*  +Guess 

Question and Focus particles:
*  +Qst +Foc 

* +Acc for Russian
* +All for Russian
* +AnIn for Russian animate
* +Anim for Russian
* +Cmpar for Russian
* +Count for Russian
* +Epenth for Russian
* +Imp for Russian imperative
* +Impf for Russian 
* +Inan for Russian	inanimate
* +Ins for Russian
* +Fac for Russian
* +Fem for Russian feminine
* +MFN for Russian
* +Msc for Russian masculine
* +Neu for Russian neuter
* +Perf for Russian
* +PObj for Russian
* +Pos for Russian
* +Prb for Russian
* +Pred for Russian predicate 
* +PrsAct for Russian 
* +Pst for Russian

# Semantic tags

Semantic tags to help disambiguation & synt. analysis: (before POS)
Borrowed from main/langs/sme/src/morphology/root.lexc

## Simplex tags
